Utah statutes.
72-3-113.   Truck limitations on Legacy Parkway.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Legacy Parkway" means the proposed or existing four-lane limited access
highway that runs approximately 14 miles from I-215 in Salt Lake County to US
89 in Davis County.
(b) (i)  "Reconstruction of I-15 between US 89 in Farmington and I-215 in
North Salt Lake City" means the physical construction work necessary to add
capacity to the portion of I-15 from I-215 in Davis County to the interchanges
with US 89 and I-15 in Farmington.
(ii)  "Reconstruction of I-15 between US 89 in Farmington and I-215 in North
Salt Lake City" does not include:
(A)  preparation of environmental impact statements;
(B)  preliminary design work or repairs; and
(C)  maintenance and operations of the highway that do not add capacity to the
highway.
(c) (i)  "Truck" means any vehicle:
(A)  with five or more axles; or
(B)  of 80,000 pounds or greater registered gross vehicle weight.
(ii)  "Truck" does not include:
(A)  equipment owned and operated by the United States Department of Defense
when driven by any active duty military personnel and members of the reserves
and National Guard on active duty including:
(I)  personnel on full-time National Guard duty;
(II)  personnel on part-time training;
(III)  National Guard military technicians; and
(IV)  civilians who are required to wear military uniforms and are subject to
the Code of Military Justice;
(B)  authorized emergency vehicles as defined in Section 41-6a-102 operated by
emergency personnel but not including commercial tow trucks; or
(C)  recreational vehicles that are driven solely as family or personal
conveyances for noncommercial purposes.
(2)  The Legislature finds and declares that the limitation of trucks being
operated on the Legacy Parkway under Subsection (3) is due to the unique
location of the Legacy Parkway, which is adjacent to the Legacy Nature
Preserve.
(3)  The department shall restrict trucks from being operated on the Legacy
Parkway provided that:
(a)  trucks shall be allowed to be operated on the Legacy Parkway during
reconstruction of I-15 between US 89 in Farmington and I-215 in North Salt
Lake City; and
(b)  trucks shall be allowed to be operated on the Legacy Parkway if diversion
of traffic from I-15 or another route is determined to be necessary by the
highway patrol and the department in the event of an incident, following
standard procedures for protecting public safety.
